Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1752.01
Solid waste collection service; commencement; resolution; requirements.

Any municipality which intends to provide or expand municipal solid waste collection service in an area where the collection of solid waste has been provided by a private entity for a minimum of ninety days shall, by resolution, proclaim its intent to begin municipal solid waste collection in the area, whether by the use of municipal employees and equipment or by contract. The resolution shall be made by a vote of the governing body at a public meeting.

Laws 1995, LB 629, § 1.